Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.24f of Title 21, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Firearm


Preservation Act”.


B. As used in this act:


1. “Federal firearms license” means a license issued by the


United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives



Req. No. 3458 Page 1


that authorizes an individual or entity to engage in certain


activities related to firearms;


2. “Firearm” means any weapon that will or is designed to expel


a projectile by the action of an explosive; and


3. “Law enforcement agency” means any state, county, municipal,


or other law enforcement entity in this state.


C. A firearm obtained through a court-ordered turnover, estate


settlement due to death, forfeiture, or any other method of


acquisition by this state or any political subdivision thereof shall


not be destroyed or rendered permanently inoperable. Any such


firearm obtained by this state or any political subdivision thereof


shall be retained by the acquiring entity until the firearm is


lawfully disposed of pursuant to the provisions of this act.


D. A law enforcement agency shall auction firearms obtained


pursuant to the provisions of this act exclusively to individuals


who are lawfully eligible to purchase such firearms under state and


federal law. An individual who purchases a handgun shall be subject


to, and pass, any required criminal history record check required by


state and federal law. Any proceeds from an auction of firearms


shall be allocated to the law enforcement agency that conducted the


auction for operational expenses, training, or other purposes


consistent with state law. A firearm shall be transferred in


compliance with any applicable state and federal regulations.



Req. No. 3458 Page 2


E. No law enforcement agency nor its personnel shall be liable


in a civil or criminal proceeding for any harm, injury, or death


caused by the subsequent use of a firearm that was auctioned to an


eligible buyer pursuant to the provisions of this act.


F. Any law enforcement agency that conducts an auction pursuant


to the provisions of this act shall maintain records of all


auctioned firearms, including the firearm purchaser’s federal


firearms license number and a record of payment. Such records shall


be retained for a period of no less than five (5) years and shall be


subject to inspection by the Attorney General.


G. 1. Any law enforcement agency in violation of the


provisions of this act shall be subject to a fine of Five Hundred


Dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and a fine of One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) for each subsequent offense.


2. Any fine collected pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3458 BRC 1/15/2026 12:28:22 PM











Req. No. 3458 Page 3